Massachusetts, session 194th, H1488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 30 the following section:-
Section 31. (a) Subject to appropriation, the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall administer the residential assistance for families in transition homelessness
prevention program for households whose incomes are at or below 50 per cent of the area
median income and who are at risk of homelessness, eviction, loss of housing subsidy,
foreclosure or utility shut-off within the next 12 months. For the purposes of this program, to
receive cash benefits or other services, it is not necessary for a household to have received a
shut-off notice from a utility company, notice to quit or summary process summons and
complaint, or otherwise be subject to the summary process pursuant to chapter 239. Risk of
eviction, loss of housing subsidy, foreclosure and utility shut-off may be determined by certified
statements from the landlord, subsidy provider, mortgage holder, utility company, or the
of 3

applicant household verifying outstanding rent, mortgage or utility costs and the household’s
current inability to pay said charges. The executive office shall ensure that not less than 50 per
cent of the funds be provided to households with incomes not greater than 30 per cent of area
median income. Eligible households shall include, but not be limited to, families with children
under the age of 21, elders, persons with disabilities, and unaccompanied youth. Services and
cash benefits under the program shall be made available to households for the prevention of the
loss of public, subsidized, or unsubsidized housing. The executive office shall not impose any
additional access or benefit restrictions on households residing in public or subsidized housing.
Cash benefits for arrearages shall not exceed the actual liability. Eligible households may receive
benefits for short-term rental or utility payments to offset future costs, to pay for other expenses
that otherwise would leave the household at risk of homelessness, and to pay for broker fees that
otherwise would be the responsibility of the tenant. Funds from this program shall be available to
cover up to 12 months in combined rental arrearage and forward rent payments for eligible
households. The executive office and administering agencies shall make direct payments
available to tenants or subtenants whose landlords are unresponsive or refuse payments. In
administering the program, the executive office shall coordinate with the department of
transitional assistance, member agencies and offices of the Massachusetts interagency council on
housing and homelessness or successor body, and the agencies contracted to administer the
residential assistance for families in transition program on behalf of eligible households served
by those agencies and offices to streamline the application process, provide additional support
services, and better promote upstream homelessness prevention and housing stability.
(b) The executive office shall annually, on or before December 31, issue a report on the
rental, mortgage, and utility assistance program created by this section. The report shall be
of 3

submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
housing, and the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate. The report also shall be
posted online in a timely manner in a searchable format so that such information is available to
the public. The report shall include but not be limited to the following information:
(i) the referral source for each household and number of households referred by said
source;
(ii) the number of applications requested, the number of applications completed, the
number of applications approved;
(iii) the number of applications rejected and the reasons for denial;
(iv) the household income and demographic information for each qualifying household
and its members. This information shall be provided by zip code and cumulatively;
(v) the monthly rent or mortgage liability for each qualifying household and the amount
of each arrearage payment; and
(vi) the housing status of each qualifying household at 6, 12, and 24 months after receipt
of services or cash benefits.
of 3